District of Columbia statutes.
48-713

Cease and desist order; embargo.

(a)

If the Mayor determines that a hazardous condition exists that may endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the community, the Mayor may issue a cease and desist order to require a violator to cease operation immediately. Any person subject to a cease and desist order may appeal the cease and desist order within 7 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, but shall be required to comply with the order pending appeal. The Mayor shall hold a hearing within 7 days of the receipt of a timely request and issue a decision within 7 days after the hearing.

(b)

If the Mayor determines that a drug is adulterated or misbranded, the Mayor may order that the drug be removed from availability for distribution, sale, consumption, or use, or that the drug be destroyed or embargoed.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 14, 37 DCR 2631

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1013.